Hawaii statutes.
[§27-54] Data collection relating to the
well-being of Hawaii's children and families. (a) The Hawaii performance
partnerships board with the assistance of the center on the family at the
University of Hawaii at Manoa, shall establish key indicators and data sets
relevant to the health, education, and socioeconomic well-being of Hawaii's
children and families.

(b) The Hawaii performance partnerships board
may request and shall receive from every department, division, board, bureau,
commission, or other agency of the State and its political subdivisions,
cooperation and assistance in the performance of its duties relating to results
and performance accountability, decision-making, and budgeting. [L 2001, c 274,
§1]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to chapter 304 but is
renumbered to this chapter pursuant to §23G-15.

Cross References

Departmental data sharing (improving educational and
workforce outcomes), see §27-7.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next